examples/09_example.lexd
PATTERNS
Noun [<N>:] Suffix[-adj] | (Suffix[adj] AdjInflection)
Noun [<N>:] NounInflection

LEXICON Noun
ночь
печь

LEXICON Suffix
<dim>:ка
<adj>:н[adj]

LEXICON AdjInflection
<m><sg><nom>:ой

LEXICON NounInflection
<nom>:
<acc>:
